Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2408
False information on application; other violations; penalties; confiscation of handgun.

Any person who willfully provides false information on an application form for a certificate under section 69-2404 shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class IV felony, and any person who intentionally violates any other provision of sections 69-2401, 69-2403 to 69-2407, and 69-2409.01 shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. As a part of the judgment of conviction, the court may order the confiscation of the handgun.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 4.

The false information on an application form, which can subject an applicant to this section, is not limited to the required information under section 69-2404 of the applicant's full name, address, date of birth, and country of citizenship and, if the applicant is not a U.S. citizen, as to the applicant's place of birth and his or her alien or admission number. State v. Hofmann, 310 Neb. 609, 967 N.W.2d 435 (2021).